Alaska statutes. Title 2. Aeronautics.
Chapter 10. Aeronautics and Communication.

Collateral references. —

8A Am. Jur. 2d, Aviation, § 26.

2A C.J.S., Aeronautics and Aerospace, § 11 et seq.

Sec. 02.10.010.
Supervision over aeronautics and communication; regulations.

The Department of Transportation and Public Facilities shall supervise aeronautics and communications inside the state, and shall make recommendations for the establishment, location, maintenance, operation, and use of airports, landing fields, air markings, air beacons, and other navigation facilities.

The department shall, whenever it considers the action necessary in the interest of general safety or the safety of those engaged in aeronautics, adopt regulations establishing minimum standards with which all air navigation facilities shall comply, and shall adopt and enforce regulations to safeguard from accident and to protect the safety of persons operating or using aircraft and persons and property on the ground, and to develop and promote aeronautics and communications in the state. However, the regulations may not duplicate or conflict with the aeronautical and communications regulations adopted by the United States Department of Transportation or the Federal Communications Commission.

The department shall adopt regulations governing the proper protection of the records of the proceedings of the department and the filing and publicizing of its regulations so that they are accessible to and generally known by the interested public.

History.

(§ 32-3-3 ACLA 1949; am §§ 1, 2 ch 56 SLA 2001)

Cross references. —

For Aviation Advisory Board, see AS

44.42.200

—

44.42.290

.

Administrative Code. —

For airport closure and construction, see 17 AAC 42, art. 7.

Collateral references. —

2A C.J.S. Aeronautics and Aerospace, § 14.

Duty and liability as to preflight inspection and maintenance of aircraft. 30 ALR2d 1172.

Public regulation requiring mufflers or similar noise-preventing devices on aircraft. 49 ALR2d 1202.

Public regulations as to duty of airplane owner or operator to furnish aircraft with navigational and flight safety devices. 50 ALR2d 898.

Validity, construction, and application of state criminal statute prohibiting reckless operation of aircraft. 89 ALR3d 893.

Secs. 02.10.020 , 02.10.030.
Investigations and hearings; use of reports of or testimony in investigations as evidence and department employees as witnesses. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 02.10.040.
Regulations governing radio ground stations.

The department shall adopt regulations governing the following:

the establishment of ground radio transmitters, adapted to the use of phone or code, of the power and on the frequencies needed, and for which permits can be obtained from the Federal Communications Commission, at or in the cities of Ketchikan, Juneau, Cordova, Anchorage, Fairbanks, and Nome, or as many of the cities as the department considers necessary for thorough communications coverage;

the establishment of schedules for operation of the ground stations, together with the necessary arrangements for the stations to receive weather and other data available through other communication agencies;

the use of the ground stations for commercial purposes, other than aviation, where no other communications service is available, provided that commercial use shall be limited to communications to the nearest United States Signal Corps station, or to its destination where no Signal Corps station is located;

other uses to which the ground stations can be put, on the frequencies, and under the licenses, on which they are authorized to operate;

the proper protection of the records of the proceedings of the department and the filing and publicizing of its regulations so that they are accessible to and generally known by the interested public;

the fixing of tolls to be charged for use of ground stations for commercial purposes, and the manner and method of accounting for the tolls;

the establishment of additional radio telephone stations, or the relocation of stations already established, which, in the opinion of the department are necessary, and from which the benefits and advantages expected to be derived, justify the cost of installation and maintenance.

History.

(§ 32-3-6 ACLA 1949; am § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, paragraphs (2) - (8) were renumbered as (1) - (7) to reflect the 2001 repeal of former paragraph (1).

Sec. 02.10.050.
Use of revenue. [Repealed, § 2 ch 8 SLA 1968.]

Secs. 02.10.060 — 02.10.090.
Community and private cooperation; penalties; department defined; short title. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]